Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5713.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-8-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-8 entitled "Local
Canvassing Authorities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-8-2. Term and qualifications for office.
(a) Each member of a local canvassing authority shall be appointed to serve for a term of
six (6) years beginning on the first Monday of March succeeding the date of his or her appointment
and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. No person shall be appointed or serve as a
member of the authority who is an officer or employee of the United States or of this state, or who
is an officer or employee of the authority’s city or town; provided, that in any city a member of the
authority may be employed as its clerk. Any member of the authority who becomes a candidate for
election to any public office and who fails to file a declination of the candidacy within the time
allowed by law shall be disqualified from holding membership upon the authority and his or her
successor shall be immediately elected.
(b) No member of the authority may hold any partisan office including town/city party
committees or representative/senate district committees. Any member who fails to file a declination
of candidacy, within ten (10) days of declaring said candidacy, shall be subject to a five hundred
dollar ($500) fine and immediate dismissal from the authority. This requirement shall apply to
membership on partisan elected state committees, as outlined above, as well.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002018
========
LC002018 - Page 2 of 3